Utah statutes.
17-19a-201.   Seal.

(1)  The county legislative body shall furnish the auditor a seal in accordance with Subsection (2).

(2)  The seal shall contain or be impressed with:

(a)  the name of the county; and

(b)  "State of Utah, County Auditor."



Enacted by Chapter 17, 2012 General Session

